Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4120.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 9, article 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-1047, to read: START_STATUTE15-1047. High school graduation; verification; fees; annual report A. in addition to the disclosures authorized by section 15-1043, the department of education shall adopt policies and procedures to allow the department to verify that an individual is a high school graduate according to information submitted to the student accountability information system by a school in this state.  The policies and procedures adopted pursuant to this subsection must ensure that any verification pursuant to this subsection complies with the family educational rights and privacy act (20 United States Code section 1232g). B. The department may establish and collect fees for providing verification services pursuant to this section.  The department is not required to provide VERIFICATION SERVICES pursuant to this section for more than one hundred requests per calendar year. C. On or before March 1, 2027 and each year thereafter, the department shall report to the governor, the speaker of the HOUSE of representatives and the president of the senate, and shall provide a copy of the report to the secretary of state, the following information for the immediately preceding calendar year: 1. The number of verification requests that the department received. 2. The number of requests for which the department provided verification services. 3. The costs incurred and revenues generated by the verification services. END_STATUTE